Maryland, session 2025, SB0213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–210.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maternal and Child Health Population
Health Improvement Fund.
(b) There is a Maternal and Child Health Population Health Improvement Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to invest in maternal and child population health
improvements through the Medical Care Programs Administration and the Prevention and
Health Promotion Administration.
(d) The Department and the Commission shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
– 1 –

Ch. 30 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) A uniform, broad–based assessment of a reasonable amount in hospital
rates in order to invest in maternal and child population health improvements under §
19–207 of this subtitle;
(2) Interest earnings; and
(3) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used only for expenses associated with maternal and child
health population health improvements through December 31, [2025] 2027.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only:
(1) In accordance with the State budget; and
(2) After the approval of a majority of the members of the Commission.
(j) Money expended from the Fund is supplemental to and is not intended to take
the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for the Maryland Medical
Assistance Program.
(k) The Fund is subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as provided in
§ 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –